Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-303
Sidewalks, bridges; injuring or obstructing; penalty.

Any person who purposely destroys or injures any sidewalk, public or private bridge, culvert, or causeway, removes any of the timber or plank thereof, or obstructs the same shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor and shall be liable for all damages occasioned thereby and all necessary costs of rebuilding or repairing the same.

Laws 1879, § 70, p. 136;

R.S.1913, § 3028;

C.S.1922, § 2779;

C.S.1929, § 39-1010;

R.S.1943, § 39-704;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-704;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 27.

Destruction of private, public, or toll bridge, penalty, see section 39-806.